apertium-sux.sux.twol
Alphabet
 A B Ç D E Ä F G H I J Ž K L M N Ň O Ö P R S Ş T U Ü W Y Ý Z
 a b ç d e ä f g h i j ž k l m n ň o ö p r s ş š t u ü w y ý z ŋ ḫ
 %{A%}:a %>:0 %{redup%} %{ %} %- ;

Sets

Vowel = a e i o u ;

Rules

" for reduplication of noun  for plural"
%{redup%}:cx <=> :cx :%- _ ; 
where cx in ( a b c d e ä f g h i j ž k l m n ň o ö p r s ş t u ü w y ý z   ) ;


"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
i:0 <=> Vow %{VSUF%}:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
